Utah statutes.
63B-14-201.   Revenue Bond Authorizations -- State Building Ownership Authority.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building Ownership Authority, under the authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease-purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $7,867,000 for the acquisition and construction of three stores for the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, together with additional amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the stores to be addressed through this authorization are:

(a)  a new wine store in the downtown Salt Lake City area;

(b)  a new store in Washington County; and

(c)  a new store in southwest Salt Lake County.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  increased sales revenues be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this subsection; and

(b)  the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control may request operation and maintenance funding from sales revenues.

